

























Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Takes Position in Anthem, Inc. (NYSE:ANTM) - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Anthem Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Anthem Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

LKQ Corporation (NASDAQ:LKQ) vs. LKQ (LKQX) Head to Head Survey
J.Jill Inc (NASDAQ:JILL) Expected to Post Quarterly Sales of $179.02 Million
U S Concrete (USCR) vs. James Hardie Industries PLC. (JHX) Head to Head Survey
Pool Corporation (NASDAQ:POOL) is Handelsinvest Investeringsforvaltning’s 8th Largest Position
Jsr Corp (JSCPY) Upgraded to Buy at Zacks Investment Research
Stifel Nicolaus Reiterates Hold Rating for Etsy, Inc. (ETSY)
Ipswich Investment Management Co. Inc. Reduces Position in Microsoft Corporation (MSFT)
Nationwide Fund Advisors Continues to Hold Position in Calpine Corporation (CPN)
FENNER (FNERF) Rating Increased to Buy at Zacks Investment Research
Stifel Nicolaus Reaffirms “Hold” Rating for J.B. Hunt Transport Services, Inc. (JBHT)
Cisco Systems, Inc. (CSCO) Shares Bought by Country Trust Bank
Rehmann Capital Advisory Group Boosts Position in Walt Disney Company (The) (DIS)
Howard Hughes Medical Institute Sells 11,721 Shares of Home Depot, Inc. (The) (HD)
Dubuque Bank & Trust Co. Has $6.98 Million Stake in Wells Fargo & Company (WFC)
Hikari Power Ltd Maintains Position in International Business Machines Corporation (IBM)
Fisher Asset Management LLC Increases Position in Facebook, Inc. (FB)
Brokerages Set Check Point Software Technologies Ltd. (CHKP) Target Price at $108.67
Dorel Industries Inc. (DIIBF) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Brokerages
Lakeland Bancorp, Inc. (LBAI) Receives Consensus Rating of “Hold” from Analysts
Starfire Investment Advisers Inc. Holds Position in Johnson & Johnson (JNJ)


 


Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Takes Position in Anthem, Inc. (NYSE:ANTM)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 22nd, 2017 // No Comments 

Tesco Pension Investment Ltd purchased a new position in shares of Anthem, Inc. (NYSE:ANTM) during the second quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The fund purchased 744,087 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $139,985,000. Anthem accounts for 4.1% of Tesco Pension Investment Ltd’s portfolio, making the stock its 12th largest position. 
A number of other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also made changes to their positions in ANTM. FTB Advisors Inc. boosted its position in shares of Anthem by 11.1% in the first quarter. FTB Advisors Inc. now owns 668 shares of the company’s stock worth $117,000 after buying an additional 67 shares during the period. Westside Investment Management Inc. boosted its position in shares of Anthem by 33.6% in the first quarter. Westside Investment Management Inc. now owns 795 shares of the company’s stock worth $131,000 after buying an additional 200 shares during the period. Focused Wealth Management Inc acquired a new position in shares of Anthem during the first quarter worth $149,000. Guardian Life Insurance Co. of America boosted its position in shares of Anthem by 0.7% in the first quarter. Guardian Life Insurance Co. of America now owns 1,016 shares of the company’s stock worth $168,000 after buying an additional 7 shares during the period. Finally, Point72 Asia Hong Kong Ltd acquired a new position in shares of Anthem during the first quarter worth $181,000. 88.66% of the stock is currently owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 


 Get Anthem Inc. alerts:



Shares of Anthem, Inc. (NYSE:ANTM) traded down 0.02% during mid-day trading on Friday, hitting $190.65. 1,227,876 shares of the company were exchanged. The stock has a market cap of $50.52 billion, a PE ratio of 18.47 and a beta of 0.73. Anthem, Inc. has a 12-month low of $114.85 and a 12-month high of $194.94. The stock’s 50-day moving average price is $189.74 and its 200 day moving average price is $171.52. 




Anthem (NYSE:ANTM) last issued its earnings results on Wednesday, April 26th. The company reported $4.68 EPS for the quarter, beating analysts’ consensus estimates of $3.85 by $0.83. The business had revenue of $22.32 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $21.23 billion. Anthem had a return on equity of 13.13% and a net margin of 3.19%. Anthem’s revenue was up 9.9% on a year-over-year basis. During the same period in the prior year, the company posted $3.46 earnings per share. On average, equities analysts anticipate that Anthem, Inc. will post $11.78 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
The company also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Friday, June 23rd. Investors of record on Friday, June 9th were paid a $0.65 dividend. The ex-dividend date was Wednesday, June 7th. This represents a $2.60 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 1.36%. Anthem’s payout ratio is 25.22%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: “Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Takes Position in Anthem, Inc. (NYSE:ANTM)” was published by BNB Daily and is the property of of BNB Daily. If you are accessing this story on another website, it was illegally stolen and republished in violation of US & international copyright and trademark law. The correct version of this story can be read at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/22/tesco-pension-investment-ltd-takes-position-in-anthem-inc-nyseantm.html. 
A number of brokerages have weighed in on ANTM. Cantor Fitzgerald reaffirmed a “buy” rating and set a $136.00 price target on shares of Anthem in a research report on Thursday, May 11th. Morgan Stanley began coverage on shares of Anthem in a research report on Tuesday, June 6th. They set an “equal weight” rating and a $196.00 price target on the stock. Bank of America Corporation lifted their price target on shares of Anthem from $224.00 to $228.00 and gave the company a “buy” rating in a research report on Friday, July 14th. Deutsche Bank AG lifted their price target on shares of Anthem from $173.00 to $185.00 and gave the company a “hold” rating in a research report on Thursday, July 13th. Finally, Citigroup Inc. reaffirmed a “buy” rating and set a $205.00 price target on shares of Anthem in a research report on Wednesday, June 28th. Twelve investment analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and ten have assigned a buy rating to the stock. The company has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $174.26.
In other Anthem news, Director Julie A. Hill sold 555 shares of the stock in a transaction on Wednesday, May 24th. The stock was sold at an average price of $180.56, for a total transaction of $100,210.80. Following the completion of the transaction, the director now directly owns 37,448 shares in the company, valued at $6,761,610.88. The transaction was disclosed in a filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is accessible through this hyperlink. Also, SVP Ronald W. Penczek sold 867 shares of the stock in a transaction on Wednesday, June 7th. The stock was sold at an average price of $187.46, for a total value of $162,527.82. Following the transaction, the senior vice president now owns 1,872 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $350,925.12. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders sold 4,103 shares of company stock valued at $749,555 over the last 90 days. 0.36% of the stock is currently owned by corporate insiders. 
About Anthem
Anthem, Inc is a health benefits company. The Company operates through three segments: Commercial and Specialty Business, Government Business and Other. It offers a spectrum of network-based managed care plans to large and small employer, individual, Medicaid and Medicare markets. Its managed care plans include preferred provider organizations; health maintenance organizations; point-of-service plans; indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including consumer-driven health plans; and hospital only and limited benefit products. 
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding ANTM? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Anthem, Inc. (NYSE:ANTM).

 
Receive News & Ratings for Anthem Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Anthem Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 






























Tesco Pension Investment Limited: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 8:48 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Tesco Pension Investment Limited



Snapshot People




Company Overview



Tesco HouseDelamare RoadChestnut,  EN8 9SLUnited KingdomFounded in 2011










Key Executives for Tesco Pension Investment Limited




Mr. Steven M. Daniels


      	Chief Investment Officer
      


Age: 57
        







Mr. Ian King CFA


      	Equity Fund Manager
      








Mr. Joe Abbott






Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Tesco Pension Investment Limited Key Developments

Tesco Pension Investment Limited Presents at Middle East Investment Summit 2017, May-22-2017 through May-23-2017
May 16 17
Tesco Pension Investment Limited Presents at Middle East Investment Summit 2017, May-22-2017 through May-23-2017. Venue: Ritz-Carlton DIFC, Dubai, United Arab Emirates. Presentation Date & Speakers: May-23-2017, Ruson Smith, Chairman (and other non-executive investment and pension fund roles), Ruston Smith, Chairman (and other non-executive investment and pension fund roles).


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @sipp plc Europe 3i plc Europe A E Taylor Financial Services Limited Europe A-List Equity Research Limited Europe A. Anthony Corporate Limited Europe




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Tesco Pension Investment Limited, please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


























﻿




























Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Has $43,650,000 Position in Accenture PLC (ACN) - Week Herald














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings and News for Accenture PLC
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Accenture PLC with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @WeekHerald









Recent Posts

Broadcom Limited (NASDAQ:AVGO) Position Held by BLB&B Advisors LLC
Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Has $43,650,000 Position in Accenture PLC (ACN)
Halliburton Company Expected to Post Q3 2017 Earnings of $0.41 Per Share (NYSE:HAL)
SunTrust Banks Weighs in on IBERIABANK Corporation’s Q3 2017 Earnings (IBKC)
FIG Partners Weighs in on Lakeland Financial Corporation’s Q3 2017 Earnings (NASDAQ:LKFN)
Analysts Offer Predictions for 3M Company’s Q3 2017 Earnings (MMM)
FBR & Co Comments on First Foundation Inc.’s Q3 2017 Earnings (FFWM)
Trellus Management Company LLC Lowers Position in Nokia Corporation (NYSE:NOK)
Boston Advisors LLC Boosts Position in Oshkosh Corporation (OSK)
Boston Advisors LLC Purchases 147,987 Shares of XL Group Ltd. (NYSE:XL)
Boston Advisors LLC Acquires 570 Shares of Pool Corporation (NASDAQ:POOL)
Check Point Software Technologies Ltd. (NASDAQ:CHKP) Stake Lowered by Boston Advisors LLC
Consumer Staples Select Sect. SPDR (XLP) is Meritage Portfolio Management’s 9th Largest Position
Omnicom Group Inc. (NYSE:OMC) Shares Sold by Meritage Portfolio Management
Deutsche Bank AG Increases Legal & General Group Plc (LGEN) Price Target to GBX 270
Marston's PLC (MARS) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Shore Capital
Plant Impact Plc (PIM) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Peel Hunt
Tesco PLC (LON:TSCO) Receives Buy Rating from Deutsche Bank AG
Zacks Investment Research Downgrades Novavax, Inc. (NVAX) to Hold
Southwest Bancorp, Inc. (OKSB) Plans $0.08 Quarterly Dividend



 


Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Has $43,650,000 Position in Accenture PLC (ACN)

					Posted by Samantha Guadardo on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments 


Tweet












Tesco Pension Investment Ltd continued to hold its stake in  Accenture PLC (NYSE:ACN) during the second quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the SEC. The firm owned 352,924 shares of the information technology services provider’s stock at the end of the second quarter. Accenture PLC comprises approximately  1.3% of Tesco Pension Investment Ltd’s investment portfolio, making the stock its 25th largest position. Tesco Pension Investment Ltd’s holdings in Accenture PLC were worth $43,650,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Several other hedge funds have also added to or reduced their stakes in the stock. Perigon Wealth Management LLC raised its stake in  Accenture PLC by 127.6% in the fourth quarter. Perigon Wealth Management LLC now owns 10,499 shares of the information technology services provider’s stock worth $1,298,000 after buying an additional 5,887 shares during the last quarter.  Teachers Advisors LLC raised its stake in  Accenture PLC by 0.8% in the fourth quarter. Teachers Advisors LLC now owns 951,731 shares of the information technology services provider’s stock worth $111,476,000 after buying an additional 7,912 shares during the last quarter.  Kentucky Retirement Systems acquired a new stake in  Accenture PLC during the fourth quarter worth about $5,272,000.  Kentucky Retirement Systems Insurance Trust Fund acquired a new stake in  Accenture PLC during the fourth quarter worth about $2,352,000.  Finally, Beacon Financial Group acquired a new stake in  Accenture PLC during the first quarter worth about $327,000. Institutional investors own  77.43% of the company’s stock. 


 Get Accenture PLC alerts:



Shares of Accenture PLC (NYSE:ACN) opened at 128.16 on Friday. Accenture PLC has a 12-month low of $108.83 and a 12-month high of $129.70. The company has a market capitalization of $79.20 billion, a PE ratio of 22.70 and a beta of 1.11. The firm’s 50-day moving average is $125.80 and its 200-day moving average is $121.49. 




Accenture PLC (NYSE:ACN) last released its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, June 22nd. The information technology services provider reported $1.52 earnings per share for the quarter, hitting the consensus estimate of $1.52. The company had revenue of $8.87 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $8.82 billion. Accenture PLC had a net margin of 9.92% and a return on equity of 43.96%. Accenture PLC’s revenue for the quarter was up 5.1% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period in the previous year, the business earned $1.41 EPS.  On average, equities research analysts anticipate that  Accenture PLC will post $5.90 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: This report was originally  posted by Week Herald and is the sole property of of Week Herald. If you are accessing this report on another domain, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of US & international copyright & trademark law. The correct version of this report can be accessed at https://weekherald.com/2017/07/28/tesco-pension-investment-ltd-has-43650000-position-in-accenture-plc-acn.html. 
ACN has been the topic of a number of research reports. Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) downgraded shares of Accenture PLC from a “neutral” rating to a “sell” rating and set a $110.00 price target on the stock. in a research note on Monday, April 3rd. SunTrust Banks, Inc. downgraded shares of Accenture PLC from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating and upped their price target for the stock from $122.15 to $130.00 in a research note on Wednesday, May 24th. Cantor Fitzgerald  reaffirmed a “buy” rating and issued a $135.00 price target on shares of Accenture PLC in a research note on Monday, May 29th. Zacks Investment Research downgraded shares of Accenture PLC from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research note on Tuesday, May 30th. Finally, Robert W. Baird  reaffirmed a “neutral” rating and issued a $138.00 price target (up from $132.00) on shares of Accenture PLC in a research note on Wednesday, June 14th. Two analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, nine have given a hold rating, thirteen have given a buy rating and one  has issued  a strong buy rating to the stock. Accenture PLC currently has an average rating of “Buy” and a consensus target price of $130.71.
In other news, insider Julie Spellman Sweet sold 1,974 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction dated Friday, July 21st. The shares were sold at an average price of $128.68, for a total transaction of $254,014.32. Following the transaction, the insider now directly owns 14,082 shares in the company, valued at approximately $1,812,071.76. The transaction was disclosed in a document filed with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through the SEC website. Also, insider Gianfranco Casati sold 6,836 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction dated Monday, June 26th. The stock was sold at an average price of $122.97, for a total transaction of $840,622.92. Following the transaction, the insider now owns 61,714 shares in the company, valued at $7,588,970.58. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold a total of 74,817 shares of company stock worth $9,252,889 over the last 90 days. 0.21% of the stock is owned by company insiders. 
Accenture PLC Company Profile
Accenture plc is a professional services company serving clients in various industries and in geographic regions, including North America, Europe and Growth Markets. The Company provides management and technology consulting services. Its segments include Communications, Media and Technology; Financial Services; Health and Public Service; Products, and Resources.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding ACN? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Accenture PLC (NYSE:ACN).







Receive News & Ratings for Accenture PLC Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Accenture PLC and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News




Broadcom Limited  Position Held by BLB&B Advisors LLC





Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Has $43,650,000 Position in Accenture PLC 





Halliburton Company Expected to Post Q3 2017 Earnings of $0.41 Per Share 





FIG Partners Weighs in on Lakeland Financial Corporation’s Q3 2017 Earnings 





SunTrust Banks Weighs in on IBERIABANK Corporation’s Q3 2017 Earnings 





Analysts Offer Predictions for 3M Company’s Q3 2017 Earnings 






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 
































﻿




























Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Invests $139.99 Million in Anthem, Inc. (ANTM) - StockNewsTimes














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings & News for Anthem Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Anthem Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @StockNewTimes









Recent Posts

Kadant (NYSE:KAI) & Standex International Corporation (SXI) Financial Review
China Distance Education Holdings Limited (NYSE:DL) versus Houghton Mifflin Harcourt (HMHC) Head to Head Analysis
Head to Head Survey: Virgin America (VA) vs. Era Group (ERA)
Somewhat Positive Press Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Magellan Health (MGLN) Stock Price
Alphabet’s (NASDAQ:GOOG) “Outperform” Rating Reiterated at Robert W. Baird
Banco Santander, S.A. (SAN) Given Average Rating of “Buy” by Brokerages
Regeneron Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:REGN) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Analysts
Darryl Green Sells 76,000 Shares of ManpowerGroup (MAN) Stock
Cowen and Company Reaffirms Outperform Rating for GrubHub Inc (NASDAQ:GRUB)
Brean Capital Reaffirms Buy Rating for Bank of the Ozarks (OZRK)
Newmont Mining Corporation’s (NYSE:NEM) “Hold” Rating Reaffirmed at Jefferies Group LLC
Jefferies Group LLC Reaffirms “Hold” Rating for Goldcorp Inc. (GG)
CyberArk Software’s (NASDAQ:CYBR) Overweight Rating Reiterated at Piper Jaffray Companies
Atlassian Corporation PLC (TEAM) Upgraded to “Buy” by Zacks Investment Research
CyberArk Software Ltd. (CYBR) PT Lowered to $51.00
Westrock Company (NYSE:WRK) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Jefferies Group LLC
Horizon Pharma PLC (NASDAQ:HZNP) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Jefferies Group LLC
Pentair PLC. (PNR) Rating Reiterated by Jefferies Group LLC
Jefferies Group LLC Reiterates Hold Rating for UGI Corporation (NYSE:UGI)
Zacks Investment Research Upgrades ORBCOMM Inc. (ORBC) to Buy



 


Tesco Pension Investment Ltd Invests $139.99 Million in Anthem, Inc. (ANTM)

					Posted by Mandy Boone on Jul 22nd, 2017 // No Comments 



Tesco Pension Investment Ltd bought a new position in  Anthem, Inc. (NYSE:ANTM) during the second quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund bought 744,087 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $139,985,000. Anthem makes up  about  4.1% of Tesco Pension Investment Ltd’s holdings, making the stock its 12th largest position. Tesco Pension Investment Ltd owned approximately 0.28% of Anthem as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Other hedge funds also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Orbis Allan Gray Ltd boosted its stake in  Anthem by 46.9% in the fourth quarter. Orbis Allan Gray Ltd now owns 3,120,155 shares of the company’s stock worth $448,585,000 after buying an additional 996,248 shares in the last quarter.  Bank of The West boosted its stake in  Anthem by 1.1% in the first quarter. Bank of The West now owns 27,277 shares of the company’s stock worth $4,511,000 after buying an additional 284 shares in the last quarter.  Integrated Investment Consultants LLC boosted its stake in  Anthem by 35.3% in the first quarter. Integrated Investment Consultants LLC now owns 1,150 shares of the company’s stock worth $190,000 after buying an additional 300 shares in the last quarter.  Highland Capital Management LLC bought a new stake in  Anthem during the first quarter worth approximately $324,000.  Finally, Karp Capital Management Corp bought a new stake in  Anthem during the first quarter worth approximately $35,580,000. 88.66% of the stock is owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get Anthem Inc. alerts:



Anthem, Inc. (ANTM) traded down 0.02% during trading on Friday, reaching $190.65. 1,227,876 shares of the company’s stock traded hands. Anthem, Inc. has a 1-year low of $114.85 and a 1-year high of $194.94. The firm has a 50 day moving average of $189.74 and a 200 day moving average of $171.52. The firm has a market capitalization of $50.52 billion, a PE ratio of 18.47 and a beta of 0.73. 




Anthem (NYSE:ANTM) last released its quarterly earnings results on Wednesday, April 26th. The company reported $4.68 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $3.85 by $0.83. Anthem had a net margin of 3.19% and a return on equity of 13.13%. The company had revenue of $22.32 billion for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $21.23 billion. During the same period last year, the company earned $3.46 EPS. The firm’s revenue for the quarter was up 9.9% compared to the same quarter last year.  Equities analysts forecast that  Anthem, Inc. will post $11.78 EPS for the current year. 
The company also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Friday, June 23rd. Shareholders of record on Friday, June 9th were paid a dividend of $0.65 per share. The ex-dividend date of this dividend  was Wednesday, June 7th. This represents a $2.60 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 1.36%. Anthem’s dividend payout ratio  is currently 25.22%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: This report was  posted by StockNewsTimes and is the sole property of of StockNewsTimes. If you are accessing this report on another site, it was copied illegally and reposted in violation of international trademark and copyright law. The correct version of this report can be read at https://stocknewstimes.com/2017/07/22/tesco-pension-investment-ltd-invests-139-99-million-in-anthem-inc-antm.html. 
A number of analysts have recently commented on ANTM shares. Cantor Fitzgerald raised shares of Anthem from a “hold” rating to an “overweight” rating and boosted their target price for the stock from $165.00 to $210.00 in a research note on Thursday, April 27th. Sanford C. Bernstein boosted their target price on shares of Anthem from $202.00 to $212.00 and gave the stock an “outperform” rating in a research note on Friday, April 28th. Deutsche Bank AG boosted their target price on shares of Anthem from $166.00 to $173.00 and gave the stock a “hold” rating in a research note on Friday, April 28th. Citigroup Inc.  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $205.00 target price on shares of Anthem in a research note on Wednesday, June 28th. Finally, Morgan Stanley started coverage on shares of Anthem in a research note on Tuesday, June 6th. They set an “equal weight” rating and a $196.00 target price for the company. Twelve research analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and ten have given a buy rating to the company’s stock. The stock currently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $174.26.
In other Anthem news, Director Julie A. Hill sold 555 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Wednesday, May 24th. The shares were sold at an average price of $180.56, for a total transaction of $100,210.80. Following the sale, the director now directly owns 37,448 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $6,761,610.88. The transaction was disclosed in a filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through the SEC website. Also, SVP Ronald W. Penczek sold 867 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Wednesday, June 7th. The stock was sold at an average price of $187.46, for a total transaction of $162,527.82. Following the sale, the senior vice president now directly owns 1,872 shares in the company, valued at $350,925.12. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold a total of 4,103 shares of company stock worth $749,555 over the last ninety days. 0.36% of the stock is owned by corporate insiders. 
Anthem Company Profile
Anthem, Inc is a health benefits company. The Company operates through three segments: Commercial and Specialty Business, Government Business and Other. It offers a spectrum of network-based managed care plans to large and small employer, individual, Medicaid and Medicare markets. Its managed care plans include preferred provider organizations; health maintenance organizations; point-of-service plans; indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including consumer-driven health plans; and hospital only and limited benefit products.







Receive News & Ratings for Anthem Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Anthem Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 













































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









﻿




























Alibaba Group Holding Limited (BABA) Position Maintained by Tesco Pension Investment Ltd - Week Herald














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings and News for Alibaba Group Holding Limited
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Alibaba Group Holding Limited with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @WeekHerald









Recent Posts

IMI plc (IMI) Earns “Overweight” Rating from Barclays PLC
Cranswick plc’s (CWK) “Hold” Rating Reaffirmed at Peel Hunt
Connect Group PLC’s (LON:CNCT) Add Rating Reiterated at Peel Hunt
Spirent Communications Plc (SPT) Scheduled to Post Earnings on Thursday
Cobham plc (COB) Rating Reiterated by Barclays PLC
Anglesey Mining Plc (AYM) Receives Speculative Buy Rating from Beaufort Securities
Anglo American plc (AAL) Rating Reiterated by J P Morgan Chase & Co
Mitchells & Butlers plc (LON:MAB) PT Lowered to GBX 260 at Peel Hunt
Centrica PLC’s (CNA) “Sell” Rating Reiterated at Deutsche Bank AG
Close Brothers Group plc (CBG) Earns Equal weight Rating from Barclays PLC
Regal Entertainment Group (RGC) Announces Quarterly  Earnings Results, Misses Estimates By $0.01 EPS
The Sage Group plc (SGE) Given New GBX 700 Price Target at Deutsche Bank AG
Brightcove Inc. (NASDAQ:BCOV) Announces  Earnings Results
Capstead Mortgage Corporation (NYSE:CMO) Posts Quarterly  Earnings Results
Universal Technical Institute (NYSE:UTI) vs. Franklin Covey (FC) Head to Head Comparison
United Fire Group (NASDAQ:UFCS) Receiving Somewhat Positive News Coverage, Analysis Shows
Sienna Senior Living Inc (TSE:SIA) Receives Average Rating of “Hold” from Brokerages
Edwards Lifesciences Corporation (NYSE:EW) Issues FY17 Earnings Guidance
Analysts Set Eaton Vance Corporation (NYSE:EV) Target Price at $48.07
Zacks: Faurecia  (NASDAQ:FURCY) Given Consensus Rating of “Hold” by Analysts



 


Alibaba Group Holding Limited (BABA) Position Maintained by Tesco Pension Investment Ltd

					Posted by Rex Bailey on Jul 24th, 2017 // No Comments 


Tweet












Tesco Pension Investment Ltd continued to hold its stake in shares of  Alibaba Group Holding Limited (NYSE:BABA) during the second quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund owned 545,600 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock at the end of the second quarter. Alibaba Group Holding Limited comprises about  2.3% of Tesco Pension Investment Ltd’s investment portfolio, making the stock its 19th largest position. Tesco Pension Investment Ltd’s holdings in Alibaba Group Holding Limited were worth $76,875,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Several other large investors have also recently made changes to their positions in the stock. Wilbanks Smith & Thomas Asset Management LLC raised its position in shares of  Alibaba Group Holding Limited by 0.9% in the first quarter. Wilbanks Smith & Thomas Asset Management LLC now owns 2,563 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock valued at $276,000 after buying an additional 23 shares during the period.  Comerica Securities Inc. raised its position in shares of  Alibaba Group Holding Limited by 1.9% in the first quarter. Comerica Securities Inc. now owns 2,527 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock valued at $272,000 after buying an additional 47 shares during the period.  WFG Advisors LP raised its position in shares of  Alibaba Group Holding Limited by 5.3% in the first quarter. WFG Advisors LP now owns 1,180 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock valued at $127,000 after buying an additional 59 shares during the period.  Bank of The West raised its position in shares of  Alibaba Group Holding Limited by 3.1% in the second quarter. Bank of The West now owns 2,463 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock valued at $347,000 after buying an additional 73 shares during the period.  Finally, Raymond James Trust N.A. raised its position in shares of  Alibaba Group Holding Limited by 0.9% in the first quarter. Raymond James Trust N.A. now owns 11,220 shares of the specialty retailer’s stock valued at $1,210,000 after buying an additional 98 shares during the period. 36.61% of the stock is owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 


 Get Alibaba Group Holding Limited alerts:



Alibaba Group Holding Limited (BABA) opened at 151.89 on Monday. Alibaba Group Holding Limited has a one year low of $81.94 and a one year high of $156.41. The stock has a 50 day moving average of $140.71 and a 200-day moving average of $116.01. The firm has a market capitalization of $384.28 billion, a PE ratio of 60.35 and a beta of 2.62. 




Alibaba Group Holding Limited (NYSE:BABA) last posted its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, May 18th. The specialty retailer reported $0.63 earnings per share for the quarter, missing the consensus estimate of $0.64 by $0.01. The firm had revenue of $5.61 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $5.26 billion. Alibaba Group Holding Limited had a return on equity of 15.40% and a net margin of 27.51%. During the same period in the prior year, the company earned $0.47 earnings per share.  On average, equities analysts predict that  Alibaba Group Holding Limited will post $4.56 EPS for the current year. 
Alibaba Group Holding Limited declared that its board has authorized a stock repurchase program on Thursday, May 18th that permits the company to buyback $6.00 billion in    shares. This buyback authorization permits the specialty retailer to repurchase shares of its stock through open market purchases. Shares buyback programs are usually a sign that the company’s board of directors believes its shares are undervalued. 
WARNING: This report was originally  posted by Week Herald and is the sole property of of Week Herald. If you are accessing this report on another site, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of US and international trademark and copyright law. The correct version of this report can be viewed at https://weekherald.com/2017/07/24/alibaba-group-holding-limited-baba-position-maintained-by-tesco-pension-investment-ltd.html. 
Several research analysts have weighed in on the stock. Zacks Investment Research raised shares of Alibaba Group Holding Limited from a “hold” rating to a “strong-buy” rating and set a $157.00 target price for the company in a research note on Thursday, June 15th. Royal Bank Of Canada  reaffirmed a “buy” rating and set a $120.00 target price on shares of Alibaba Group Holding Limited in a research note on Tuesday, May 16th. Barclays PLC increased their target price on shares of Alibaba Group Holding Limited from $130.00 to $132.00 and gave the stock an “overweight” rating in a research note on Wednesday, May 10th. Bank of America Corporation  reaffirmed a “buy” rating and set a $161.00 target price (up previously from $144.00) on shares of Alibaba Group Holding Limited in a research note on Sunday, June 11th. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC  reaffirmed a “buy” rating and set a $160.00 target price (up previously from $122.00) on shares of Alibaba Group Holding Limited in a research note on Monday, June 12th. One equities research analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, three have issued  a hold rating, thirty-two have given a buy rating and two have given a strong buy rating to the stock. Alibaba Group Holding Limited currently has a consensus rating of “Buy” and an average target price of $140.85.
About Alibaba Group Holding Limited
Alibaba Group Holding Limited is a holding company. Through its subsidiaries, the Company is engaged in online and mobile commerce through offering of products, services and technology that enable merchants, brands and other businesses to transform the way they market, sell and operate in the People’s Republic of China (China) and internationally.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding BABA? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Alibaba Group Holding Limited (NYSE:BABA).







Receive News & Ratings for Alibaba Group Holding Limited Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Alibaba Group Holding Limited and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News




IMI plc  Earns “Overweight” Rating from Barclays PLC





Connect Group PLC’s  Add Rating Reiterated at Peel Hunt





Cranswick plc’s  “Hold” Rating Reaffirmed at Peel Hunt





Spirent Communications Plc  Scheduled to Post Earnings on Thursday





Cobham plc  Rating Reiterated by Barclays PLC





Anglesey Mining Plc  Receives Speculative Buy Rating from Beaufort Securities






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 



































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Tesco Pension Investment Ltd: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback























tesco pension investment ltd
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Management
Tesco Pension Investment Limited operates as a pension fund.




Corporate Information
Address:

Tesco House, Shire Park
Kestrel Way
Welwyn Garden City, AL7 1GA
United Kingdom


Phone:
44-8450-701-113


Fax:
-























From The Web












Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data

































    Tesco Pension Investment Limited | United Kingdom | DueDil
    Search for a company or director
  Sign InSign InProductTeamsCustomersPlansAboutInternationalBlogHelpTalk to sales 020 3137 8490
    Product
  
    Teams
  
    Customers
  
    Plans
  
    About
  
    Contact DueDil
  
        Tesco Pension Investment Limited
    GB|ActiveReportAdd to ListKey InformationActivityNews & SocialPeopleLocationsDirectorsOwnershipGroupDocumentsFinancialsCredit RiskTurnover
                                          15.5M
                                                                                        GBP18.20%
                                          Debt to Capital (%)
                                          100
                                                                                        %Liquidity Ratio
                                          0.93
                                                                                Cash
                                          1.7M
                                                                                        GBP5.75%
                                          DetailsCompany nameTesco Pension Investment LimitedCompany number07754822Legal Entity Identifier2138007HV8ZZO49STE85
                                                         Source
                                  Company typePrivate limited with share capitalIncorporation date26 Aug 2011Type of accounts filingFull AccountsLatest annual returns
                            08 Jun 2017
                        Next annual returns due
                                22 Jun 2018
                                                                                            Latest annual accounts
                                    31 Mar 2016
                                Next annual accounts due
                                31 Dec 2017
                                                                                            SIC 2003
                                7414 — Business And Management Consultancy Activities
                            SIC 2007
                                70221 — Financial Management
                            Websitehttp://www.pensionwebsite.co.ukSocial MediaRegistered AddressTesco House Shire ParkKestrel WayWelwyn Garden CityAL7 1GAUnited KingdomTrading addresses and phone numbers
                            Find contact information in the Locations tab.
                        Go to LocationsDescription
            
                
            
    Tesco Pension Investment Limited was registered on 26 Aug 2011        with its registered office in Welwyn Garden City.
                The business has a status listed as "Active".                     
                It currently has  3 directors.
    
                        The company's first directors were Ruston Arthur Mark Smith, Steven Daniels.            The business currently employs 20-49 people.            Tesco Pension Investment Limited
                                has no subsidiaries.        RegulationFinancial Conduct Authority See the FCA status of any company. For Enterprise users only.
                        Cash1,737,000 GBPEnable JavaScript to view the graph.Current Liabilities10,310,000 GBPEnable JavaScript to view the graph.Net Assets0 GBPEnable JavaScript to view the graph.Current Assets9,541,000 GBPEnable JavaScript to view the graph.Registered NamesFromUntilPrevious Name30 Jun 2008PresentWidgets R Us Ltd01 Jun 197030 Jun 2008Widgets Were Us LtdRegistered NamesFind out if this company has traded using a different registered name.See sampleCompany characteristicsIndustry Keywords
                                        financial advisers
                                    
                                        business consulting
                                    
                                        management consulting
                                    
                                        financial management
                                    
                                        financial consulting
                                    
                                        pension scheme
                                    Size
                                    Medium
                                
                                Turnover
                                (6.5M
                                to
                                50M)
                            Age
                                    Startup
                                
                                0-5 years
                            Location
                                    AL7
                                AboutChoose a DescriptionDueDil DescriptionCompanies House DescriptionHelp keep this company's profile up to date.Add a DescriptionCompanies House DescriptionThe provision of services exclusively to the Tesco PLC Pension Scheme (the Pension Scheme).LocationChoose an AddressRegistered addressTrading addressTesco House Shire ParkKestrel WayWelwyn Garden CityAL7 1GAUnited KingdomTesco House Shire ParkShires ParkKestrel WayWelwyn Garden City, HertfordshireAL7 1GAUnited KingdomView mapView map
                                    Get rich data on the companies that matter to you.
                            
                                    DueDil provides company information to help businesses find opportunities and mitigate risk.
                            Make your business more agile and resilient today.View PlansLearn MoreGrow RevenueStreamline OnboardingMinimise RiskImprove Collaboration×


























TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LIMITED, AL7 1GA WELWYN GARDEN CITY Financial Information






































TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LIMITED








TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LIMITED


















Home
TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LIMITED













Address
 
TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LIMITED


TESCO HOUSE, SHIRE PARK

KESTREL WAY

WELWYN GARDEN CITY

UNITED KINGDOM

AL7 1GA





Classification:

Financial management

Legal Information

Company Registration No.:
07754822


Incorporation Date:

26 Aug 2011
 (5 Years old)



Financial Year End:

31 Mar


Capital:

£1.00
 on 22 Jun 2017




Latest Company Accounts




For period ending:

31 Mar 2016


Filed on:
3 Aug 2016



Purchase latest accounts for £4.99


View sample




Latest Annual Return
Directors & Shareholder Information



As at:
8 Jun 2016


Filed on:
20 Jun 2016


Purchase latest return for £4.99
View sample






 Information correct as of: 14 Jul 2017 -
Check for updates









Map













Recently Filed Documents - 27 available


CONFIRMATION STATEMENT MADE ON 08/06/17, WITH UPDATES - £4.99


Annual Accounts For Year Ended 31 Mar 16 - £4.99


Annual Return As At 8 Jun 16 (not accounts) - £4.99


Change of particulars for director - £4.99


Change of particulars for director - £4.99




View all 27 documents


Directors and Secretaries


Steven Daniels


8 Sep 2011 ⇒
Present (
5 Years )

Director


Danny Firth


3 Sep 2012 ⇒
Present (
4 Years )

Director


Ruston Smith


26 Aug 2011 ⇒
Present (
5 Years )

Director


 Tesco Secretaries Limited


15 Oct 2013 ⇒
Present (
3 Years )

Company Secretary



Full list of current and 3 past directors


Charges / mortgages against this Company

SAMPENSION KP INTERNATIONAL A/S
RENT DEPOSIT DEED
-
OUTSTANDING
on
7 Jan 2012


Previous Addresses

TESCO HOUSE DELAMARE ROADCHESHUNTEN8 9SL

Changed 29 Dec 2015







Unclaimed Domain Names for this Company's Website
The following domain names appear to be available to register, if this is your company you should claim the domain names before your competitors register them.

www.tescopensioninvestment.co.uk

Register at GoDaddy


www.tescopensioninvestment.com

Register at GoDaddy


www.tescopensioninvestment.net

Register at GoDaddy


www.tescopensioninvestment.financial

Register at GoDaddy


www.tescopensioninvestment.org.uk

Register at GoDaddy


www.tescopensioninvestment.org

Register at GoDaddy


www.tescopensioninvestment.management

Register at GoDaddy


Company Annual Accounts

Next annual accounts are due on:
31 Dec 2017


Given past performancewe expect these to be submitted around:
7 Sep 2017



Accounts for Financial Year EndingDate Accounts SubmittedNumber Of Months After Year End Of Submission


31 Mar 2016 
3 Aug 2016
5



31 Mar 2015 
16 Dec 2015
9



31 Mar 2014 
18 Aug 2014
5



31 Mar 2013 
15 Aug 2013
5



31 Mar 2012 
22 Aug 2012
5




Do you do business with this company?
Receive a free
alert email
if there are any changes to this company, such as a change of address or new financial documents become available
Is this your company?

Is the information we hold correct?


Provide a short description about your company
Add a Trading Name & Address
Add your phone numbers
Add a link to your Website
Free!



Update Company Information




Do you want total editorial control of this page?


Add your own company information
Remove public financial information
Remove advertising
Change the information instantly and as often as you like



Enhanced Listing





Official AccountsLatest Annual accounts for year ending 31 Mar 16


Profit and Loss Account
Balance Sheet
Share Capital
Delivered online instantly

Buy Now - £4.99 ex VAT

27 other company documents are available





Monitor Company

Receive an alert email on changes to financial status
Early indications of liquidity problems
Warns when company reporting is overdue
Free service, no spam emails

Monitor Now







Companies With Similar Director Names

TESCO NAVONA (GP) LIMITED
ONE-NIL ADVISORY LIMITED
BLINKBOX BOOKS LIMITED
BLINKBOX MUSIC LIMITED
BEDMINSTER ESTATES LIMITED
More...


Companies With Same Post Code

TESCO STORES LIMITED
TESCO PLC
BUGDEN LIMITED
DELAMARE ONE LIMITED
THE TESCO ATRATO LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
More...


Activity
This company viewed 67 times in the last few years





























TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LTD Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LTD
                    

•   LONDON, X0
                          • Pension/Retirement
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Tesco Pension Investment LTD is based out of London.   Their last reported 13F filing for Q2 2017 included $3,393,230,000 in managed 13F securities
    and a top 10 holdings concentration of 53.25%. Tesco Pension Investment LTD's largest holding is Aon Plc with shares held of 1,530,405.   WhaleWisdom has at least 7 13Fs and  4 13D/G filings in our database for Tesco Pension Investment LTD. 
                                           














Summary
13F Holdings
Ind. Managers
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)
UK Holdings



                Download 13F Summary to Excel
              


                    Download 13F Summary to Excel
                  


   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LTD, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel















06/30/2017
Top Buys




Name% Change


IEMG
        
        iShares Core MSCI E...
4.22%



PPG
        
        PPG Industries, Inc.
1.883%



ANTM
        
        Anthem Inc
1.782%



UNH
        
        UnitedHealth Group ...
1.205%



PCLN
        
        Priceline Group Inc
1.146%








06/30/2017
Top Sells





Name% Change


AAPL
         
         Apple Inc
4.072%


WBA
         
         Walgreens Boots All...
3.624%


ABEV
         
         Ambev S.A. ADR
1.182%


AAP
         
         Advance Auto Parts,...
1.122%


DLPH
         
         Delphi Automotive Plc
0.91%







06/30/2017
13F Holdings Summary




Stock% Port


AON
                                                  
                                                  Aon Plc
5.9963%


GOOG
                                                  
                                                  ALPHABET INC CAP STK CL C
5.9271%


MDT
                                                  
                                                  Medtronic Inc.
5.8291%


FIS
                                                  
                                                  Fidelity National Informati...
5.4588%


TMO
                                                  
                                                  Thermo Fisher Scientific, Inc.
5.3803%

See All Holdings






06/30/2017
13F Activity




Market Value
                        $3.393 Billion

                        Prior Market Value
                        $3.027 Billion
New Purchases2 stocks
Additional Purchases11 stocks
Sold out of4 stocks
Reduced holdings in2 stocks
Top 10 Holdings %53.25%
Turnover %
                        [1]:20.00%
Turnover Alt %
                    [2]:13.19%
Time Held Top20:2.35 quarters
Time Held Top10:2.60 quarters
Time Held All:2.53 quarters

[1]:
                  Turnover is calculated by taking the # of new holdings (initial purchases) + the # of positions sold out of (not just reduced) divided by the total # of holdings for the quarter.
                
[2]:
                  Alt Turnover is calculated by taking either the total MV of new purchases or
                   the MV of securities sold, whichever is less,
                   divided by the total MV of the fund.
                






06/30/2017
13F Sector Allocation Over Time











Fund Metrics

You are limited to the prior 8 quarters of 13F filings.
            Subscribe to WhaleWisdom to view all filing data
            for TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LTD






Portfolio Performance
                    Top 20 equal-weighted holdings. Last updated
                      on 2017-06-29 



Performance
                      for Q1 2017:
                    
2.64%


Performance Last 4 Quarters:
0.0%





Performance Metrics
Stats are not available for the latest quarter














Backtester

Use WhaleWisdom's Backtester tool to test how a hypothetical portfolio would have performed with different
        investment strategies. Research one or more filers' performance and then optimize their portfolios to match your
        own investment goals.
Start with one of our predefined groups or create your own.
        View the
        Backtesting Whitepaper
        and the Getting Started page for
        additional help.
      



Take a Tour

           Save Changes to Tracked Backtest
Saving......

GENERATE
      REPORT
At least
      one fund must be selected before running a backtest
    
{{InvalidConfiguration()}}


    {{ErrorMessage}}
  

    "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
    and
    "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
    are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
  


Backtester

Use WhaleWisdom's Backtester tool to test how a hypothetical portfolio would have performed with different
        investment strategies. Research one or more filers' performance and then optimize their portfolios to match your
        own investment goals.
View the
        Backtesting Whitepaper
        and the Getting Started page for
        additional help.



GENERATE
      REPORT


    {{ErrorMessage}}
  

    "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
    and
    "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
    are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
  




Filers Selected: {{groupinfo.group.description}} - {{groupinfo.group.filers.length}}
      (click to edit)


      {{criteria.whalescore.description}}
      (click to edit)


      Filers being chosen based on prior performance
    
Get started by using: 

WhaleWisdom Fund Groups
WhaleScore Filers

One of your custom groups
Choose Filers by Performance
Log in to use your saved groups
Create new custom group



WhaleWisdom Fund Groups


{{g.filers.length}}

{{g.description}}





Use Heat Map Stocks







{{g.filers.length}}

{{g.description}}






< Back

Select WhaleScore Filers:
WhaleScore filers are chosen based on scores calculated the previous quarter.


Pro Sub. Required

{{o.description}}






< Back

Select Filers by Prior Performance
Filers are selected each quarter based on their prior performance. You can restrict which
      filers are included by using the filters below.



          Pro subscription required to select filers by performance
        


How do you want funds chosen?




Maximum Filers to use each quarter

            

(your subscription allows up to {{Limit}} filers):
Maximum number of filers
              to use exceeed
Maximum filers must set to
              at least 1




Quarterly turnover %






% top 10 concentration






 # of Holdings in 13F
              Portfolio
from:
            
            to
            
{{criteria.filer_performance.holdings_from_to[0]}} - {{criteria.filer_performance.holdings_from_to[1]}}


 Market Cap of Fund's 13F
              Portfolio
from:
            
            to
            

                                                      {{format_number(criteria.filer_performance.mc_from_to[0])}} - {{format_number(criteria.filer_performance.mc_from_to[1])}}
                                                    


 Avg. Time Held Top 10 (quarterly)
from:
            
            to
            

                                                                {{criteria.filer_performance.time_held_top10_from_to[0]}} quarters - {{criteria.filer_performance.time_held_top10_from_to[1]}} quarters
                                                              





Matching filers from latest quarter:
{{FilerPerformanceMatches}}






< Back
{{groupinfo.group.filers.length}}




Backtest options
Optional Stock Filters
Optional Hedging/Advanced



< Back


How do you want stocks selected when rebalancing?  


{{s.description}}
          


5
10
20
30
40
50


 (Pro sub. required)



        "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
        and
        "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
        are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
      


(optional) Minimum # of funds holding stock

(optional) Minimum percent of portfolio for each fund


Custom Weight Per Fund (scale of 1 through 10)


{{filer.name}}





Reset Weight



Specify the number of holdings to use



          {{s.description}}
        

          ** Holdings greater than 20 require a Pro level subscription to use. **
        




How do you want available funds allocated among stocks?  








< Back



Restrict Stocks Selected by Stock Market Cap Size?


 {{cap.name}}
                              




Stock Exclusions
Do not include stocks whose price exceeds:

Do not include stocks whose price is less:

Do not include any of the following tickers:
                                                          (comma separated)






ETF Filter
 ETF Holdings Only

 Exclude ETFs


ADR Filter *Pro Only*
 Foreign ADR Only

 Exclude ADRs





Limit Stock Selection to Certain Sectors or Industries? Restrict stocks to those in the selected sector or industry







< Back




Hedging Strategies

Simple Short Exposure. This strategy effectively shorts the S&P 500 by
        buying shares in the S&P 500 Short ETF.
        Simple Hedging will assume that 100%
        of the backtest's invested principal is always in the backtest's long positions.

        For example, if you choose a 25% hedging rate, then for a $10,000 portfolio,
        you will be long $10,000 and have a $2,500 short on the S&P 500.
        The short position will adjust each rebalancing period to match 25% of the total portfolio.
        Any gains/losses from the short are added to the overall available capital for the long positions in the
        portfolio.
      

Moving Average Hedge.  With this strategy, your portfolio will be hedged
        by shorting the S&P 500 whenever your long portfolio's performance drops below the monthly moving average.
        So if you set a 25% hedge, 25% of your long portfolio will be sold and the funds reallocated to the short
        whenever the hedge is in effect.
        Once your long portfolio performance goes back over the moving average, the short hedge will be removed
        and the funds from the short will be reallocated to your long positions.
      

        When hedging strategies are being used, backtests can only go back as far as 2006.  This is the date
        the S&P 500 Short ETF first appeared.
      

        Pro subscription required to use hedging strategies
      
Hedging Strategy:

      

No Hedging

          Short-Exposure Hedge
        

          Moving Average Hedge
        

Moving Average Months:


Moving Average Target:
                   

Your backtested portfolio
S&P 500 TR Index
Russell 2K TR Index

the moving average that will determine when hedging is on or off

Hedging %:
      

25%
50%
75%
100%



Stock Sell Buffer

      You can optionally include a stock sell buffer in your backtesting model.
      It works by keeping a stock in your portfolio even when it would otherwise drop out
      during rebalancing as long as it remains within your sell buffer threshold.
      For example, you are backtesting with the top 20 stocks each quarter and set a sell buffer of 50.
      In the first quarter, AAPL is one of the top 20 stocks and is included in the portfolio.
      In quarter 2, AAPL drops down to number 25. Without the sell buffer, AAPL would drop out
      for that quarter, but since it is still within the sell buffer threshold of 50,
      it will remain in the portfolio.
      Your portfolio size remains the same. The stocks that would have fallen out stay in and the
      stocks that would otherwise have been added stay out. Using the sell buffer may
      help produce a lower turnover rate.
    

      Sell Buffer Size (must be greater than # of holdings in portfolio to work):
      
No sell buffer
10
25
35
50
100




Rebalancing Frequency

      By default backtester rebalances quarterly using new 13F filing data. You can
      adjust the rebalancing frequency using the dropdown below. Reasons for
      changing the frequency include lower turnover and possible tax advantages
      by keeping stocks at least one year before selling.
    


        Do not rebalance after each quarter

or rebalance:
        
Every quarter (default)
 Every other quarter
 Once a year




How many days after the end-of-quarter date before doing the backtest? (0 - 60) 

DAYS





      Or use day whenever the filing was submitted to the SEC
      (or the last filing when using a group of funds):
Starting Quarter

      By default backtester will test your strategy using all available dates going back to 2001 (for subscribers only).
      You can optionally adjust when the backtest actually starts.
    
Starting Quarter:
      
All Available Dates


  Ending Quarter:
      
All Available Dates






GENERATE
      REPORT





Backtest Results:



Download Backtest Data to Excel
Downloading.  Please wait.....


Start Tracking This Backtest
Saving......


                                    Stop tracking this backtest
                                  
Log in to start tracking this backtest



No report has been run






                                {{s.description}}
                              

Configure Moving Averages


As of 2017-07-28








Want to backtest using all available 13F history?
      As a non-subscriber you are limited to the past two years of filing data.
        Subscribe now and backtest using 13F holdings data as
        far back as 2001.
      








 
YTD
1Y
2Y
3Y
5Y
7Y
10Y
Total Return
Annualized
Std Dev
Sortino



Whale(s)
Unhedged Portfolio

{{starting_record.yearly_entries[starting_record.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,10)| number:2}}%
{{starting_record.performance*100|number}}%
{{starting_record.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{starting_record.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{starting_record.sortino|number}}


Hedged Portfolio
{{hedged_matrix.yearly_entries[hedged_matrix.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,10)| number:2}}%
{{hedged_matrix.performance*100|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.sortino|number}}


{{chart.comparison_index.description}}
{{chart.comparison_index.yearly_entries[chart.comparison_index.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,10)| number:2}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.performance*100|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.sortino|number}}









                          Current Holdings Rebalanced on {{results.ending_period.start_date}}
                          Click the "Download Backtest Data to Excel" link above to see all stock activity


                          Stock prices used are the "total returns" stock price and will include
                          dividends, spinoffs, splits, and other adjustments.  Because of this, stock
                          prices shown here will likely not
                          match a stock's actual closing stock price on the same date.
                        





Stock Name
% of Portfolio
Avg Price Per Share(total returns price)
Total Returnas of 2017-07-28
Original Purchase Date



            								                  {{transaction.ticker}}
            								               {{transaction.stock_name}}

Sold All
{{transaction.percent_of_portfolio*100.0|number:2}}

{{transaction.avg_price|currency}}


                                ${{starting_record.hedging_gain|number:2}}
                              

                                {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(transaction)|number:2}}%
                                                            

{{transaction.original_purchase_date}}


{{results.ending_period.hedge.stock_name}}

{{transaction.avg_price|currency}}

                              {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(results.ending_period.hedge)|number:2}}%
                            

                              {{results.ending_period.hedge.original_purchase_date}}
                            


*** Currently using {{ending_hedged_transaction.stock_name}} ***

{{ending_hedged_transaction.avg_price|currency}}

                                                        {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(ending_hedged_transaction)|number:2}}%
                                                      

                                                        {{ending_hedged_transaction.original_purchase_date}}
                                                      









Ending Sector Allocation

















































Quarter to view:

Current Combined 13F/13D/G
Q2 2017 13F Filings 
Q1 2017 13F Filings 
Q4 2016 13F Filings 
Q3 2016 13F Filings 



                      Refresh
                    
 Advanced Export
Download CSV
Download Excel (.xlsx)
Download TSV







                               Click to See Additional Filters
                              



Security Types:




                  Shares


                  Calls


                  Puts


                  Principal

Changes in Holdings:

 New Position
Added to Position
Reduced Position
Closed Out Position
No Change



Ranking is in the top:



Minimum # of shares:



Stock ticker: 



Is ETF?
YesNo



                                      Refresh
                                    








Edit Columns


*Shares are split adjusted
		






×
Report an error






Your name (optional):


Your email (optional):


Error to report or any other comments(required):













                









Cancel





 Click here to report any possible errors with this listing.





13F Filings Available:



                            2017-06-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2017-03-31 - 13F-HR/A
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2017-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-12-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-09-30 - 13F-HR/A
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-09-30 - 13F-HR/A
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-09-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          






×
CSV Export Module



      This will schedule a job to export all requested 13f holdings data for this filer.
      When completed, an email will be sent to the email address you specify
      containing a link to download the .zip file of the CSV file(s) you requested.
    



Output Type


             Output all 13f holdings into a single CSV file
             

              Output all 13f holdings into separate CSV files per quarter
              



Columns to include


Filer Name
Stock Name
Stock Ticker
Quarter Date
Type of Security
Current Shares Held
Current Market Value
Previous Shares Held
Previous Market Value
Current % of Portfolio
Previous % of Portfolio
Current Rank
Previous Rank
Change in Shares
Type of Change
Sector




13F Quarters to include


2017-06-30
2017-03-31
2016-12-31
2016-09-30




Email Address to send data to








Cancel
Schedule Export








Schedule 13D and 13G events since 06/30/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 06/30/2017
Loading...




**EXPERIMENTAL** Current UK Positions
Updated daily

    Contains transactions from January 1st, 2015 on.
  



Holder
Issuer
Transaction Date
Number of Voting Rights
% of Voting Rights




TESCO PENSION INVESTMENT LTD
DP Aircraft I Limited
2015-06-12
10,000,000
4.78%



Position History



Holder
Issuer
Transaction Date
Number of Voting Rights
% of Voting Rights













Elevate your investments
Try it for free



























	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started









































Barron’s 2017 Best Online Broker Ranking - Barron's










































































 







 


 








Asia Edition
U.S. Edition



 

Subscribe
Log In






Home

Magazine

This Week's Edition
Past Editions
New: Cartoons



Daily

All Coverage
Barron's Take
Weekday Trader
Up & Down Wall St. Daily
Getting Technical
Striking Price Daily
Wall Street's Best Minds
Read This, Spike That
Stocks to Watch Today
Asia Stocks to Watch
Income Investing
Tech Trader Daily
Focus on Funds
Emerging Markets
Q&A
Video Center



Investing Ideas

Overview
Barron's Picks & Pans
Mutual Funds / ETFs
Hedge Funds
Stocks Center
Commodities Center
Bonds Center
Options Center
Barron's Take
Weekday Trader
Stock Alert
Inside Scoop
Ahead of the Crowd
Focus on Funds
Stocks to Watch Today
Barron's Roundtable



Advisor Center

Overview
Top 100 Advisors
Top 100 Women Advisors
Top 100 Independent Advisors
Top 1,200 Advisors
Advisor Profiles



Market Data

Market Data Center
Market Lab
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
Stock Grader
Stock & Fund Tables
Barron's 400



PENTA

Penta Magazine
Penta Daily
Penta Archives



Barron's NEXT





 









 




Best Online Brokers

Barron’s 2017 Best Online Broker Ranking
Fidelity takes the top spot, with Interactive Brokers and TD Ameritrade right on its heels


 







By

Theresa W. Carey

 Biography




 




March 18, 2017


The bull market is on sale for online brokerage customers. In the run-up to our 22nd annual ranking of Barron’s Best Online Brokers, two developments topped all others: The three major indexes—the Dow Jones Industrial Average, the Standard & Poor’s 500, and the Nasdaq Composite—all set record highs, and six brokers slashed commissions and other fees. At the 16 brokers we reviewed this year, the average monthly cost of trading for an occasional investor had fallen 25% since early 2016, to $47.51 from $63.45. That means...
	      




 


Get The Full Story

Subscribe
		  or  
		 Log In


 


 




Want to participate in the discussion?



Already a subscriber? Log in for complete access.


Powered by Livefyre

 


 








 


Most Popular


1.
Why Altria is Tanking


Subscriber Content
Read Preview



2.
Starbucks: When Good Stocks Go Bad


Subscriber Content
Read Preview



3.
6 Mind-Boggling Stats on Jeff Bezos’ Wealth


Subscriber Content
Read Preview



4.
AT&T Ups Bond Sale to $22.5 Billion; Third Biggest Deal Ever


Subscriber Content
Read Preview



5.
Valeant: 3 Reasons to Buy?


Subscriber Content
Read Preview



See Full List




Latest Market Videos


1




Barron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News



2




A Bright Picture for Netflix



3




Amazon Borrows a Page From Instagram




 




 





















